Hawaii statutes.
[§103D-706] Remedies prior to an award.
If prior to award it is determined that a solicitation or proposed award of a
contract is in violation of law, then the solicitation or proposed award shall
be:

(1) Canceled; or

(2) Revised to comply with the law. [L Sp 1993, c 8,
pt of §2]

Case Notes

Term "revise" includes remand and reconsideration;
where cancellation of solicitation was contrary to purposes underlying
procurement code, hearings officer's selection of cancellation of solicitation
was abuse of discretion. 87 H. 147, 952 P.2d 1210.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next